District of Columbia statutes.
26-804

Payment of trust accounts on death of trustee.

Whenever a deposit, savings account, or share account, which is in form in trust for another, shall be made or held by any person in any bank, trust company, savings and loan association, building association, building and loan association, or federal savings and loan association, doing business in the District of Columbia, and no other or further notice of the existence and terms of a legal and valid trust shall have been given in writing to such bank, trust company, or other association, such deposit, savings account, or share account, or any part thereof, together with the dividends, or interest thereon, may, in the event of the death of the trustee, be paid to the person for whom such deposit, savings account, or share account was made or held, or to his legal representative.

Apr. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 567, ch. 37, § 4
July 19, 1954, 68 Stat. 494, ch. 545, § 1
This section is referenced in § 26-710.
1981 Ed., § 26-204.
1973 Ed., § 26-204.